Louisiana, session 2026, SB358.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 23:1021(7) and 1061(B) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
23:1061(C) and (D) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1021. Terms defined
As used in this Chapter, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the following
terms shall be given the meaning ascribed to them in this Section:
* * *
(7)(a) "Independent contractor" means any person who renders service, other
than manual labor, for a specified recompense for a specified result either as a unit
or as a whole, under the control of his principal as to results of his work only, and not
Page 1 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-497 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 358
as to the means by which such result is accomplished, and are expressly excluded
from the provisions of this Chapter unless a substantial part of the work time of an
independent contractor is spent in manual labor by him in carrying out the terms of
the contract, in which case the independent contractor is expressly covered by the
provisions of this Chapter. The operation of a truck tractor or truck tractor trailer,
including fueling, driving, connecting and disconnecting electrical lines and air
hoses, hooking and unhooking trailers, and vehicle inspections are not manual labor
within the meaning of this Chapter.
(b) "Independent contractor occupational accident coverage" means a
private insurance that pays benefits to an independent contractor who becomes
injured, disabled, or dies due to a work-related accident. An independent
contractor, as defined in this Section, may obtain independent contractor
occupational accident coverage approved by the commissioner of insurance.
(c) Independent contractor occupational accident coverage maintained
in compliance with this Section shall satisfy injury coverage requirements for
a contractor's employee even if the principal is a statutory employer as defined
in R.S. 23:1061.
(d) Independent contractor occupational accident coverage provided
under this Section shall provide:
(i) Medical benefits of not less than one million dollars per occurrence
for medical treatment resulting from a work-related injury.
(ii) Temporary disability benefits consistent with scheduled injury
guidelines if the worker is temporarily unable to work due to a work-related
injury.
(iii) Accidental death and dismemberment benefits.
(iv) Certificate of coverage filed with Louisiana Works.
* * *
§1061. Principal contractors; liabilityStatutory employer; safe harbor for
independent contractors
Page 2 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-497 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 358
* * *
B. A principal shall not be deemed a statutory employer of a contractor
or his employee when all of the following conditions are satisfied:
(1) The contractor maintains a valid employer identification number or
is a registered business entity.
(2) The contractor executes a written independent contractor agreement.
(3) The contractor maintains active independent contractor occupational
accident coverage meeting minimum statutory standards.
(4) The contractor retains control over the means and methods of
performing the contracted work.
(5) Satisfaction of these conditions shall create a rebuttable presumption
of independent contractor status.
C. Contractors in the construction industry, including specialty trades,
commercial driver's license owner-operators, and equipment operators, may
elect coverage under this Chapter.
D. When the principal is liable to pay compensation under this Section, he
shall be entitled to indemnity from any person who independently of this Section
would have been liable to pay compensation to the employee or his dependent, and
shall have a cause of action therefor.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.